Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.070

Licensing—Procedures, requirements, fees.

Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for issuing a license shall be determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 30; 1991 c 3 s 136; 1985 c 7 s 52; 1981 c 260 s 5. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 57; 1919 c 144 s 9; RRS s 10151; prior: 1909 c 235 s 7.]